Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-113
County treasurer; liability for bond funds.

The tax and funds so collected shall be deemed pledged and appropriated to the payment of the interest and principal of the registered bonds herein provided for, until fully satisfied, and the county treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful disbursement of all money so collected or received by him.

Laws 1875, § 8, p. 172;

R.S.1913, § 378;

C.S.1922, § 295;

C.S.1929, § 11-114;

R.S.1943, § 10-113.